Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.900

Effective date—2010 c 88.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 17, 2010].

[ 2010 c 88 s 76.]